Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska41-206
Apartment house, defined.

Apartment house shall mean every building or other structure kept, used, maintained, advertised, or held out to the public to be a place where accommodations for living rooms, either furnished or unfurnished, single or in suites for light housekeeping, or both, are furnished for permanent guests, but where no dining room or cafe is maintained in the same building or under the same management, and where five or more tenants occupy such buildings, together with any buildings in connection therewith.

Laws 1982, LB 547, § 6.